apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="vigil/are__vblex">	<!-- paradigma G del curretore ortogràficu (caso general) -->
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ades</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aia</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aias</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aiat</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aìamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aiamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>aiais</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aiant</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>emus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eis</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ares</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aret</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aremus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>areis</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arent</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>emus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>adu</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ada</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ados</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adas</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vìgil/o__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="achichiare">      <p><l>achichi</l>   <r>achichiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acapiare">        <p><l>acàpi</l>     <r>acapiare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afruschiare">     <p><l>afruschi</l>  <r>afruschiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aglutinare">      <p><l>aglùtin</l>   <r>aglutinare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ammaniare">       <p><l>ammani</l>    <r>ammaniare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ammanniare">      <p><l>ammànni</l>   <r>ammanniare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aparaulare">      <p><l>aparaul</l>   <r>aparaulare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apiculare">       <p><l>apìcul</l>    <r>apiculare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arrubiare">       <p><l>arrubi</l>    <r>arrubiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="asseriare">       <p><l>assèri</l>    <r>asseriare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atapiare">        <p><l>atapi</l>     <r>atapiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atontonare">      <p><l>atònton</l>   <r>atontonare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="auntzulare">      <p><l>auntzul</l>   <r>auntzulare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="baulare">         <p><l>baul</l>      <r>baulare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brilliare">       <p><l>brilli</l>    <r>brilliare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brusiare">        <p><l>brùsi</l>     <r>brusiare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bisitare">        <p><l>bìsit</l>     <r>bisitare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cancarare">       <p><l>cancar</l>    <r>cancarare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="carcariare">      <p><l>carcàri</l>   <r>carcariare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cariare">         <p><l>cari</l>      <r>cariare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chighilliare">    <p><l>chighilli</l> <r>chighilliare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chirriare">       <p><l>chìrri</l>    <r>chirriare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="collobiare">      <p><l>collobi</l>   <r>collobiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contracambiare">  <p><l>contracambi</l><r>contracambiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contribulare">    <p><l>contrìbul</l> <r>contribulare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cracalliare">     <p><l>cracalli</l>  <r>cracalliare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="criminare">       <p><l>crimin</l>    <r>criminare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cronometrare">    <p><l>cronòmetr</l> <r>cronometrare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="crusulare">       <p><l>crùsul</l>    <r>crusulare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cabulare">        <p><l>càbul</l>     <r>cabulare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cascarare">       <p><l>càscar</l>    <r>cascarare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confutare">       <p><l>cònfut</l>    <r>confutare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dduddurare">      <p><l>dduddur</l>   <r>dduddurare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="discapatzitare">  <p><l>discapàtzit</l><r>discapatzitare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="discumbeniare">   <p><l>discumbeni</l><r>discumbeniare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="degumare">        <p><l>dègum</l>     <r>degumare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esasperare">      <p><l>esasper</l>   <r>esasperare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fatzilitare">     <p><l>fatzìlit</l>  <r>fatzilitare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fruschiare">      <p><l>fruschi</l>   <r>fruschiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="giubilare">       <p><l>giùbil</l>    <r>giubilare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="illenare">        <p><l>illen</l>     <r>illenare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="immaginare">      <p><l>immàgin</l>   <r>immaginare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="incurbiare">      <p><l>incurbi</l>   <r>incurbiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="innoriare">       <p><l>innòri</l>    <r>innoriare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intzimiare">      <p><l>intzimi</l>   <r>intzimiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscacalliare">    <p><l>iscacàlli</l> <r>iscacalliare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscapiare">       <p><l>iscapi</l>    <r>iscapiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscrefiare">      <p><l>iscrefi</l>   <r>iscrefiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscuempiare">     <p><l>iscuèmpi</l>  <r>iscuempiare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="isgangalliare">   <p><l>isgangàlli</l><r>isgangalliare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ismamadinare">    <p><l>ismamadin</l> <r>ismamadinare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ispertulare">     <p><l>ispertul</l>  <r>ispertulare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ispropriare">     <p><l>ispròpri</l>  <r>ispropriare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="isseberare">      <p><l>issèber</l>   <r>isseberare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="isterrinare">     <p><l>isterrin</l>  <r>isterrinare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="isvitziare">      <p><l>isvìtzi</l>   <r>isvitziare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lampinare">       <p><l>lampin</l>    <r>lampinare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ludriare">        <p><l>lùdri</l>     <r>ludriare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="maculare">        <p><l>macul</l>     <r>maculare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meriare">         <p><l>meri</l>      <r>meriare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mantzulare">      <p><l>màntzul</l>   <r>mantzulare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="musinare">        <p><l>mùsin</l>     <r>musinare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="netiare">         <p><l>neti</l>      <r>netiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oviare">          <p><l>ovi</l>       <r>oviare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="penitentziare">   <p><l>penitèntzi</l><r>penitentziare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="petenare">        <p><l>peten</l>     <r>petenare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pretziare">       <p><l>pretzi</l>    <r>pretziare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pastinare">       <p><l>pàstin</l>    <r>pastinare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="raddopiare">      <p><l>raddòpi</l>   <r>raddopiare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ricambiare">      <p><l>ricambi</l>   <r>ricambiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rodulare">        <p><l>ròdul</l>     <r>rodulare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="segudare">        <p><l>segud</l>     <r>segudare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sartziare">       <p><l>sàrtzi</l>    <r>sartziare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tambulare">       <p><l>tambul</l>    <r>tambulare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trapulare">       <p><l>trapul</l>    <r>trapulare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trapanare">       <p><l>tràpan</l>    <r>trapanare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tzaspiare">       <p><l>tzaspi</l>    <r>tzaspiare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tzatzarare">      <p><l>tzàtzar</l>   <r>tzatzarare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="taulare">         <p><l>tàul</l>      <r>taulare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="umidare">         <p><l>umid</l>      <r>umidare</r></p><par n="vigil/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vitziare">        <p><l>vìtzi</l>     <r>vitziare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="odiare">          <p><l>òdi</l>       <r>odiare</r></p><par n="vìgil/o__vblex"/></e>
